public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđàvemi/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđàvimo/J ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđàvimoni/K ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđàvitu/M ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđàvomi/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđè/FN ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđèu/O ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđé/FN ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéa/HNP ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéami/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéau/O ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđée/H ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéelo/Q ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéemi/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéi/LN ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéimo/J ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéimoni/K ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéitu/M ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđémoni/K ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéo/H ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéomi/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđéu/O ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđévami/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđévelo/Q ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđévemi/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđévimo/J ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđévimoni/K ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđévitu/M ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantiđévomi/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantíđelo/Q ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantíđemi/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantíđitu/M ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkantiđar arkantíđomi/I ^merkantiđar
SFX A erkar arkada/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkade/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkadi/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkado/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkando/EF [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkar/EF [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaralo/Q [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarami/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaratu/M [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarave/PR [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaremo/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaren/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaresi/N [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaresiu/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarion/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarisen/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarision/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarisié/N [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarisiéu/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarison/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarié/N [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkariéu/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaron/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarà/HLP [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaràe/P [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarè/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarèmi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaré/N [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarémoni/K [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarésimo/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarésimoni/K [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaréu/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaría/HLP [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaríami/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaríatu/M [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaríe/HP [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaríelo/Q [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaríemi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkarò/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaròmi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkase/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkasta/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkaste/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkasti/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkasto/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkava/HNP [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkavau/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkave/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkavi/LN [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkavo/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkemo/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arken/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkendo/EF [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkese/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkesta/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkeste/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkesti/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkesto/G [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkeva/HNP [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkevau/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkeve/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkevi/LN [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkevo/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkion/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkisen/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkision/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkison/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkiven/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkivion/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkivié/N [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkiviéu/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkivon/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkié/N [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkiéu/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkon/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàa/HNP [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàami/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàau/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàe/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàelo/Q [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàemi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkài/LN [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàimo/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàimoni/K [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàitu/M [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkào/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàomi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàvami/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàvelo/Q [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàvemi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàvimo/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàvimoni/K [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàvitu/M [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkàvomi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkè/FN [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkèu/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arké/FN [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéa/HNP [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéami/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéau/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkée/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéelo/Q [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéemi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéi/LN [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéimo/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéimoni/K [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéitu/M [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkémoni/K [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéo/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéomi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkéu/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkévami/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkévelo/Q [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkévemi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkévimo/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkévimoni/K [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkévitu/M [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar arkévomi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar érkelo/Q [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar érkemi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar érkitu/M [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkar érkomi/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A erkiar arken/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiada/G ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiade/G ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiadi/G ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiado/G ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiando/EF ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiar/EF ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaralo/Q ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarami/I ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaratu/M ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarave/PR ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaremo/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaren/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaresi/N ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaresiu/O ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarion/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarisen/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarision/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarisié/N ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarisiéu/O ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarison/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarié/N ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiariéu/O ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaron/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarà/HLP ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaràe/P ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarè/H ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarèmi/I ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaré/N ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarémoni/K ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarésimo/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarésimoni/K ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaréu/O ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaría/HLP ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaríami/I ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaríatu/M ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaríe/HP ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaríelo/Q ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaríemi/I ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiarò/H ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaròmi/I ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiase/G ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiasta/G ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiaste/G ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiasti/G ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiasto/G ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiava/HNP ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiavau/O ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiave/H ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiavi/LN ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiavo/H ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiemo/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkien/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkiendo/EF ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkieralo/Q ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierami/I ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkieratu/M ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierave/PR ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkieremo/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkieren/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkieresi/N ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkieresiu/O ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierion/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierisen/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierision/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierisié/N ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierisiéu/O ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierison/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierié/N ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkieriéu/O ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkieron/J ^soverkiar
SFX A erkiar arkierà/HLP ^soverkiar
