public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
inakuar/A
ralegrar/A
analiđar/A
apaltar/A
arkar/A
asar/A
inaŧidar/A
axevolar/A
bagaɉar/A
bakajar/A
inbalegar/A
balsamar/A
xbandir/A
xbaporar/A
inbarbotar/A
xbarufar/A
xbàter/A
inbaukar/A
baxnar/A
bekonar/A
bertonar/A
xbevaŧar/A
biaxemar/A
bindar/A
bisakar/A
xbixigolar/A
boɉir/A
xbokonar/A
inbonir/A
xbonsegar/A
dexborsar/A
xbotegar/A
inboŧolar/A
inbragetar/A
inbrandir/A
inbrenar/A
brinkar/A
dexbroɉar/A
brondolar/A
bruskiar/A
xbufonar/A
butar/A
cakolar/A
scaređar/A
censir/A
céñer/A
cetar/A
cipegar/A
scupar/A
kondanar/A
dekorar/A
destreɉar/A
diladiar/A
kontradíxer/A
indolentrar/A
donar/A
indorar/A
doxar/A
kondurir/A
inđaltronar/A
malđontar/A
đugatolar/A
ekonomiđar/A
epilogar/A
estenuar/A
exíster/A
putrefar/A
afadegar/A
defalkar/A
fangar/A
farsir/A
faŧionar/A
klasifegar/A
trafegar/A
ofénder/A
preferir/A
festiđar/A
sfiadar/A
sfiapir/A
sfidar/A
defilar/A
skonfinar/A
sfiorir/A
fiskaliđar/A
influir/A
desfogonar/A
foleđar/A
trasforar/A
informaɉar/A
renforŧar/A
frajar/A
franŧexar/A
fraterniđar/A
fregar/A
frexiar/A
sfroñar/A
frutuar/A
sfulminar/A
ofuskar/A
ingabanar/A
dexgaletar/A
dexganbarar/A
garantir/A
dexgardar/A
ingatejar/A
gindar/A
xgolar/A
gorar/A
dexgradir/A
ingranir/A
dexgranfir/A
graŧiar/A
gređar/A
xgretolar/A
xgriñar/A
xgrixolir/A
grostinar/A
xguanŧar/A
xguarnir/A
regurxitar/A
ibridar/A
induxiar/A
ingrotolir/A
rinproverar/A
internar/A
invidiar/A
ixolar/A
dexɉaŧar/A
ɉetar/A
ɉubilar/A
akàder/A
skagaŧar/A
kaligar/A
skalmanar/A
rekalŧitrar/A
inkanar/A
inkanelar/A
skanpanar/A
inkantonar/A
deskapelar/A
inkapriŧiar/A
skaregar/A
inkarnar/A
karpionar/A
skartoŧar/A
inkastelar/A
inkatarigolar/A
skaturar/A
inkavar/A
skaveɉar/A
inkietar/A
skodegar/A
inkokar/A
inkolar/A
deskolpar/A
skomenŧiar/A
sokónber/A
skonfuxionar/A
deskonpañar/A
konsumar/A
reskontrar/A
koñer/A
konkórer/A
akordar/A
inkordelar/A
eskorporar/A
kostar/A
inkoŧir/A
kréder/A
krestaliđar/A
krivelar/A
krostenar/A
inkrukar/A
skuaɉar/A
kuèrđer/A
intrakuirar/A
skular/A
kurar/A
kuŧolar/A
lanbikar/A
lanŧar/A
xlargar/A
xlaŧar/A
ledamar/A
deleguar/A
deletar/A
lexierir/A
ligar/A
xlimegar/A
listar/A
xlogar/A
stralosar/A
xludronar/A
perlustrar/A
madurar/A
magrar/A
xmaltar/A
dexmanegar/A
xmaniar/A
mañaŧar/A
markiar/A
xmaronar/A
maselar/A
mastruŧar/A
dexmaŧar/A
maxenar/A
trameđar/A
malmenar/A
dementir/A
meretar/A
inprométer/A
reméter/A
mijorar/A
xminuŧar/A
inmobiliar/A
mokolar/A
xmoltonar/A
sormontar/A
premorir/A
mòrder/A
tramortir/A
dexmostrar/A
mucar/A
muarar/A
murar/A
permutar/A
muxolar/A
naspar/A
nebiar/A
xnervađar/A
niŧar/A
xnonbolar/A
anuir/A
dexñarar/A
obligar/A
ojar/A
òlder/A
ondular/A
opinar/A
straordenar/A
inorpelar/A
ospitar/A
pacarar/A
pagar/A
inpaɉar/A
palernar/A
palpar/A
inpanar/A
spantađar/A
papuŧar/A
rekonparir/A
pariđar/A
spartir/A
oltrepasar/A
despastar/A
patir/A
rapatumar/A
inpaveɉar/A
peđorar/A
pelar/A
inpelugar/A
dispénder/A
inpenelar/A
pensionar/A
pepolar/A
perletar/A
repeskar/A
konpèter/A
despetorar/A
peŧolatar/A
piantar/A
piàxer/A
repiegar/A
pilotar/A
spiolar/A
inpirar/A
pispolar/A
inpiŧar/A
replegar/A
polakar/A
depóner/A
repóner/A
sponcar/A
strapónxer/A
desposesar/A
repovolar/A
preŧiar/A
inprontar/A
despupilar/A
inrabiar/A
ranciñar/A
rascar/A
reklutar/A
rexekar/A
riŧolar/A
interogar/A
rónper/A
roxegar/A
rutar/A
sakeđar/A
arsaltar/A
saraxinar/A
scànxer/A
sekondar/A
segurar/A
senbrar/A
señorar/A
insestar/A
sidiar/A
sisolar/A
skapinar/A
skaturir/A
skoltar/A
skrivakiar/A
konsolar/A
insonar/A
sotiliđar/A
spear/A
sospetar/A
ispiritar/A
spuar/A
stalar/A
restaurar/A
stipular/A
destokolar/A
straŧar/A
destropar/A
destuđar/A
persugar/A
insustar/A
staɉuŧar/A
tanburar/A
tarokar/A
taxentar/A
inténđer/A
tenutar/A
astèñer/A
intepidir/A
intestar/A
tiraneɉar/A
stonar/A
tornar/A
dexintosegar/A
trakanar/A
strasinar/A
tremar/A
trinŧar/A
trufar/A
inŧangolar/A
ŧementar/A
ŧèrner/A
ŧimegar/A
ŧoetar/A
ulular/A
stravakar/A
vanpir/A
véder/A
invelenar/A
venturar/A
devèñer/A
vergolar/A
vèrter/A
vexetar/A
rekonvínŧer/A
provixionar/A
involđar/A
xvòlxer/A
xbacar/A
inxeñar/A
xɉaventar/A
prexudegar/A
